Maine, session 132, LD570.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §683, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Additional exemption for certain homesteads based on income. A homestead
eligible for an exemption under subsections 1 and 1-B is eligible for an additional
exemption of $75,000 of the just value of the homestead for property tax years beginning
on April 1, 2026 if the individual claiming the exemption under this subsection had federal
adjusted gross income for the prior income tax year of less than:
A. For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses permitted to file a
joint return, $200,000;
B. For an individual filing as a head of household, $150,000; or
C. For a single individual or a married individual filing a separate return, $100,000.